Indiana, session 2026, HB1074.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-15-1.3-26.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26.1. (a) As used in this section,
"nutrition supports" includes the following:
(1) Case management services.
(2) Nutrition counseling and instruction.
(3) Home delivered meals, including medically tailored meals,
or pantry stocking.
(4) Nutrition prescriptions.
(5) Grocery provisions.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the office of the secretary
shall apply to the United States Department of Health and Human
Services for approval of a Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration
waiver or any other Medicaid waiver to provide Medicaid coverage
that includes nutrition supports for the following Medicaid
recipients:
(1) Medicaid recipients with chronic diseases that are
2026 IN 1074—LS 6237/DI 147


impacted by nutrition and diet.
(2) Pregnant women.
(3) Children.
2026 IN 1074—LS 6237/DI 147